Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SCHOOL START DATE FOR THE 2025-2026 AND 2026-2027 SCHOOL YEARS ONLY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 120A.40, or other law to the contrary, for the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 school years only, a school board may vote to begin the school year before Labor Day. new text end new text begin (b) A district that begins the school year before Labor Day under this section must report its start date to the commissioner of education in the form and manner determined by the commissioner. By January 5, 2027, the commissioner must submit a report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education listing the school districts that began the 2025-2026 or 2026-2027 school year after Labor Day. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end